California statutes. Labor Code
(g) On or before December 31 of each year, the Department of Industrial Relations shall submit a report to the Legislature detailing the implementation and operation of HESIS including, but not limited to, the amount and source of funds allocated and spent on repository activities, the toxic materials and harmful physical agents investigated during the past year and recommendations made concerning them, actions taken to inform
 interested persons of the possible hazards of exposure to toxic materials and harmful physical agents, and any recommendations for legislative changes relating to the functions of HESIS.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 319.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

147.3.

(a) When the Division of Occupational Safety and Health receives a report from the State Department of Public Health pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 105185 of the Health and Safety Code, the report shall constitute a complaint from a government agency representative charging a serious violation and shall subject the employer or place of employment to the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 6309 for the Division of Occupational Safety and Health to initiate an investigation within three working days. Upon the completion of the investigation, any citations and fines imposed by the division shall be made publicly
 available on an annual basis pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 6309.

(b) The blood lead level established in subdivision (c) of Section 105185 of the Health and Safety Code is not intended to supersede any lower blood lead level that may be actionable under the Division of Occupational Safety and Health’s lead standards in its general industry safety order (Section 5198 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations) or construction safety order (Section 1532.1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations). For purposes of this section, an actionable employee blood lead level means a level that triggers an employer obligation to reduce lead exposure in the workplace or an investigation by the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 710, Sec. 2.   (AB 35)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

147.4.

(a) By January 1, 2016, the department shall convene an advisory committee to evaluate whether changes are needed to align the general industry safety orders in Sections 3403 to 3411, inclusive, of Article 10.1 (commencing with Section 3401) of Group 2 of Subchapter 7 of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations with the applicable and most recently promulgated standards of the National Fire Protection Association. The committee shall be composed of parties in both management and labor, represent a cross section of the fire protection industry and community, and be competent and knowledgeable regarding personal protective clothing and equipment for firefighters and firefighting practices generally.

(b) By July 1, 2016, the advisory committee shall present its findings and recommendations for consideration by the board. No later than July 1, 2017, the board shall render a decision regarding the adoption of changes to the general industry safety orders in Sections 3403 to 3411, inclusive, of Article 10.1 (commencing with Section 3401) of Group 2 of Subchapter 7 of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, or other applicable standards and regulations, in order to maintain alignment with the applicable National Fire Protection Association standards.

(c) Beginning July 1, 2018, and every five years thereafter, the board, in consultation with the department and subject to subdivision (d), shall complete a comprehensive review of all revisions to
 National Fire Protection Association standards pertaining to personal protective equipment covered by the general industry safety orders in Sections 3403 to 3411, inclusive, of Article 10.1 (commencing with Section 3401) of Group 2 of Subchapter 7 of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations. If the review finds that the revisions to applicable National Fire Protection Association standards provide a greater degree of personal protection than the safety orders, the board shall consider modifying existing safety orders and shall render a decision regarding the adoption of necessary changes to safety orders, or other applicable standards and regulations, no later than July 1 of the subsequent year, in order to maintain alignment of the safety orders with the applicable National Fire Protection Association adopted standards.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), by January 1, 2028, the board, in consultation with the department, shall consider modifying its existing safety order regarding firefighter personal protective equipment (PPE) in a manner that addresses National Fire Protection Association performance standards for PPE that are not relevant or applicable to how firefighters utilize their PPE and that result in the use of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS), fluoropolymers, flame retardants, and other hazardous substances in firefighting personal protective garments and auxiliary firefighting PPE. In modifying the existing safety order, the board shall do all of the following:

(1) Use scientific research to create a standard for firefighter PPE used in California that includes performance standards that are relevant and applicable to how firefighters utilize their equipment while being the most protective of firefighters’ health and safety, using the 2025 NFPA 1970 Standard on Protective Ensembles for Structural and Proximity Firefighting, Work Apparel, Open-Circuit Self-Contained Breathing Apparatus for Emergency Services, and Personal Alert Safety Systems as a floor.

(2) Utilize scientific research to mandate that firefighter PPE certified for future use in California be free of hazardous substances that might pose long-term environmental and human health risks, including, but not limited to, PFAS and flame retardants. The modified safety order
 shall require manufacturers of firefighter PPE to certify that their products meet the new standards.

(3) Provide for an implementation date that applies to auxiliary firefighting PPE to be later than the implementation date for firefighting personal protective garments.

(4) Specify an implementation timeline that includes phasing out firefighter PPE that is in use at the time the safety order is modified through normal attrition or no later than 10 years after the safety order is modified.

(e) (1) By July 1, 2026, the Division of
 Occupational Safety and Health shall provide a report to the Governor and Legislature on progress toward implementation of the modified PPE safety standards.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on July 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Auxiliary firefighting PPE” means personal protective equipment other than firefighting personal protective garments,
 including self-contained breathing apparatuses and other respiratory protection products, hearing protection, protective communication devices, and fall-protection products.

(2) “Firefighting personal protective garments” means any garments designed, intended, or marketed to be worn by firefighting personnel in the performance of their duties, designed with the intent for use in fire and rescue activities, including jackets, pants, shoes, gloves, and helmets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 392, Sec. 2.   (AB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

147.5.

(a) By January 1, 2017, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall convene an advisory committee to evaluate whether there is a need to develop industry-specific regulations related to the activities of facilities issued a license pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 19300) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) By July 1, 2017, the advisory committee shall present to the board its findings and recommendations for consideration by the board. By July 1, 2017, the board shall render a decision regarding the adoption of industry-specific regulations pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 689, Sec. 7.   (AB 266)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

147.6.

(a) By March 1, 2018, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall convene an advisory committee to evaluate whether there is a need to develop industry-specific regulations related to the activities of licensees under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code, including but not limited to, whether specific requirements are needed to address exposure to second-hand marijuana smoke by employees at facilities where on-site consumption of marijuana is permitted under subdivision (d) of Section 26200 of the Business and Professions Code, and whether specific requirements are needed to address the potential risks of combustion, inhalation, armed robberies or repetitive strain injuries.

(b) By October 1,
 2018, the advisory committee shall present to the board its findings and recommendations for consideration by the board. By October 1, 2018, the board shall render a decision regarding the adoption of industry-specific regulations pursuant to this section.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 64, Sec. 6.2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Occupational Safety and Health Appeals Board [148. - 149.5.]

148.

(a) There is in the Department of Industrial Relations the Occupational Safety and Health Appeals Board, consisting of three members appointed by the Governor, subject to the approval of the Senate. One member shall be from the field of management, one shall be from the field of labor and one member shall be from the general public. The public member shall be chosen from other than the fields of management and labor. Each member of the appeals board shall devote his full time to the performance of his duties.

(b) The chairman and each member of the appeals board shall receive the annual salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) The Governor shall designate the chairman of the appeals board from the membership of the appeals board. The person so designated shall hold the office of chairman at the pleasure of the Governor. The chairman shall designate a member of the appeals board to act as chairman in his absence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

148.1.

Each member of the appeals board shall serve for a term of four years and until his successor is appointed and qualifies. The terms of the first three members appointed to the appeals board shall expire on the second, third, and fourth January 15th following the date of the appointment of the first appointed member. A vacancy shall be filled by the Governor, subject to the approval of the Senate by appointment for the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

148.2.

The appeals board may employ necessary assistants, officers, experts, hearing officers, and such other employees as it deems necessary. All such personnel of the appeals board shall be under the supervision of the chairman of the appeals board or an executive officer to whom the chairman delegates such responsibility. All such personnel shall be appointed pursuant to the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except for the one exempt deputy or employee allowed by subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article XXIV of the California Constitution. The salaries of the hearing officers shall be fixed by the State Personnel Board at a rate comparable to that of other referees or hearing officers in state service whose duties and responsibilities are comparable, without regard to whether such other positions have membership in the State Bar of California as a prerequisite to appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

148.4.

All decisions and orders of the appeals board shall be in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

148.5.

A decision of the appeals board is final, except for any rehearing or judicial review as permitted by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6600) of Part 1 of Division 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

148.6.

A decision of the appeals board is binding on the director and the Division of Occupational Safety and Health with respect to the parties involved in the particular appeal. The director shall have the right to seek judicial review of an appeals board decision irrespective of whether or not he or she appeared or participated in the appeal to the appeals board or its hearing officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 101.)
-------------------------------------------

148.7.

The appeals board, acting as a whole, may adopt, amend, or repeal rules of practice and procedure pertaining to hearing appeals and other matters falling within its jurisdiction. All such rules, amendments thereto, or repeals thereof shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

148.8.

The appeals board and its duly authorized representatives in the performance of its duties shall have the powers of a head of a department as set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except for Section 11185 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

148.9.

Decisions of the appeals board shall be made by a majority of the appeals board, except as otherwise expressly provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

149.

The chairman of the appeals board may authorize its executive officer to act as deputy appeals board member, and may delegate authority and duties to the executive officer in the event of the absence of a member of the appeals board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

149.5.

The appeals board may award reasonable costs, including attorney’s fees, consultant’s fees, and witness’ fees, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in the aggregate, to any employer who appeals a citation resulting from an inspection or investigation conducted on or after January 1, 1980, issued for violation of an occupational safety and health standard, rule, order, or regulation established pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) of Division 1, if (1) either the employer prevails in the appeal, or the citation is withdrawn, and (2) the appeals board finds that the issuance of the citation was the result of arbitrary or capricious action or conduct by the division.

The appeals board shall adopt rules of practice and procedure to implement this section.

The payment of costs pursuant to this section shall be from funds in the regular operating budget of the division. The division shall show in its proposed budget for each fiscal year the following information with respect to the prior fiscal year:

(a) The total costs paid.

(b) The number of cases in which costs were paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1077.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Labor Statistics and Research [150. - 157.]

150.

(a) The department shall collect, compile, and present facts and statistics relating to the condition of labor in the state, including information as to cost of living, labor supply and demand, industrial relations, industrial disputes, industrial accidents and safety, labor productivity, sanitary and other conditions, prison labor, and such other matters in relation to labor as the Director of Industrial Relations deems desirable.

(b) To the extent not in conflict with this or any other section, on the date this subdivision becomes operative, the responsibilities of the Division of Labor Statistics and Research that are specified in Subchapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) and
 Subchapter 2 (commencing with Section 14900) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations are reassigned to the Division of Occupational Safety and Health and the responsibilities of the Division of Labor Statistics and Research that are specified in Subchapter 3 (commencing with Section 16000) of Chapter 8 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations are reassigned to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 83.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

151.

(a) The department shall conduct an annual survey of the ethnic derivation and gender of the individuals who are parties to apprentice agreements described in Section 3077. In conducting this survey, the division shall use any pertinent data which the federal government may provide to avoid duplication of effort.

(b) The Division of Apprenticeship Standards shall cooperate in the accomplishment of the survey required by this section. The occasion of this survey may be used to gather additional current data as may be of benefit to apprenticeship programs.

(c) Data gathered pursuant to this section shall not be evidence per se of an unlawful employment practice.

(d) This section shall not be construed to authorize a state agency to require an employer to employ a specified percentage of individuals of any particular ethnic derivation or gender irrespective of those individuals’ qualifications for employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 8.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

152.

The Director of Industrial Relations and authorized employees of the department may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, papers, and records; administer oaths; examine witnesses under oath; take the verification or proof of written instruments; and take depositions and affidavits for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this code and performing the duties required by this chapter. They shall have free access to all places of labor. Any person, or agent or officer thereof, who willfully neglects or refuses to furnish statistics requested by the division, which are in his or her possession, or under his or her control, or who refuses to admit the director or his or her authorized employee to a place of labor, is guilty of
 a misdemeanor. The director may direct the chief and the employees of other divisions of the department to transmit any statistical information in their possession, or to conduct investigations and otherwise assist in the gathering of whatever statistics the director deems desirable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 85.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

153.

Except as provided in Section 151 no use shall be made in the statistical or other reports prepared pursuant to this chapter of the names of persons supplying the information required under this code. Any agent or employee of the department who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 86.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

156.

An annual report containing statistics on California work injuries and occupational diseases and fatalities by industry classifications shall be completed and published by the department no later than December 31 of the following calendar year. All of the reports and statistics shall be available to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 87.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

157.

(a) The Department of Industrial Relations shall provide the Department of Transportation with links to existing public registries and databases related to drayage trucks.

(b) The Department of Industrial Relations shall also provide the Department of Transportation with links to existing public databases that may include information on either or both of the following:

(1) Employers who are committing workers’ compensation fraud.

(2) Health and safety enforcement activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 458, Sec. 3.   (AB 2057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Division of Occupational Safety and Health [175. - 176.]

175.

The Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall be the lead agency in providing for public health and safety as well as worker health and safety in the construction, maintenance, and operation of any liquefied petroleum gas storage facility, other than a facility owned or maintained by a public utility, having a capacity of 100,000 barrels or more, including storage vessels, and related piping, pumping, distribution, and transfer apparatus. As the lead agency, the division shall request any state or local agency having statutory public health and safety jurisdiction over any part of the construction, maintenance, or operation of any such liquefied petroleum gas storage facility, other than a facility owned or maintained by a public utility, to exercise its statutory jurisdiction in relation to such facility, and shall report to the Legislature any instance in which such jurisdiction was not exercised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

176.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the Dymally-Alatorre Bilingual Services Act, Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 7290) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, was enacted in 1973 to provide for the removal of language barriers that prevent the people of this state who are not proficient in English from effectively accessing government services and otherwise communicating with their government.

The Legislature further finds and declares that limited-English-proficient individuals will benefit from increased language-based access to the programs and services of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

The Legislature further finds and declares that federal statistics show that from 1996 to 2000, while overall worker fatalities dropped 14 percent, immigrant worker fatalities rose 17 percent. Immigrant workers die on the job at higher rates because they frequently work in more dangerous industries with little or no training. Language barriers compound the problem because training and warning signs are often only in English.

(b) As used in this section, a “public contact position” means any position responsible for responding to telephone or in-office inquiries or taking complaints from the general public regarding matters pertaining to occupational safety and health.

(c) As used in the section, an “investigative position” means any position responsible for investigating complaints, injuries, or deaths related to occupational safety and health.

(d) As used in this section, “limited-English-proficient” refers to persons who speak English less than “very well,” in accordance with United States Census data.

(e) The division shall make all efforts to ensure that limited-English-proficient persons can communicate effectively with the division. Examples of potential measures include, but are not limited to, the hiring of bilingual persons in public contact positions and investigative positions, the use of contract based interpreters, and the use of telephone-based interpretation services. Nothing contained in this section relieves the division of its separate obligations under the Dymally-Alatorre Bilingual Services Act, Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 7290) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, or any other state or federal laws requiring the provision of its services in languages other than English.

(f) On July 30, 2004, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall issue a progress report to the Legislature on the implementation of this section that shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(1) The most recent information provided to the California State Personnel Board pursuant to Section 7299.4 of the Government Code.

(2) The number of bilingual employees in public contact and investigative positions in each local office of the division and the languages they speak, other than English.

(3) A description of any centralized system or other resources for providing translation and interpretation services within the division.

(4) A description of any quality control measures or evaluations undertaken by the division to evaluate whether limited-English-proficient persons are able to communicate effectively with the division.

(5) A description of any means, such as contracted interpreters, telephone-based interpretation services, or video conferencing, used by the division to communicate with individuals who are limited-English-proficient in the event that bilingual employees in public contact or investigative positions are not available, and the frequency in which these services were used by the division during the most recent fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 203.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Alternative Enforcement [180. - 182.]

180.

As used in this chapter, “public prosecutor” means the Attorney General, a district attorney, a city attorney, a county counsel, or any other city or county prosecutor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 659, Sec. 2.   (AB 594)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

181.

(a) In addition to any other remedies available, a public prosecutor may prosecute an action, either civil or criminal, for a violation of Division 2 (commencing with Section 200), but excluding Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 1140) and Part 13 (commencing with Section 2698), or Division 3 (commencing with Section 2700), but excluding Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070), or to enforce those provisions of this code independently, or to enforce any other provisions of this code as specifically authorized.
 All remedies available for violations of this code, including, but not limited to, wages, liquidated damages, and other civil penalties, may be recovered in an action by a public prosecutor under this chapter. Remedies recovered shall go first to workers to cover any unpaid wages, damages, or penalties owed to those workers, and any remaining civil penalties shall go to the General Fund of the state in an action under this chapter. An action of a public prosecutor under this chapter shall be limited to redressing violations occurring within the public prosecutor’s geographic jurisdiction, unless the public prosecutor has statewide authority or has enforcement authority pursuant to Section 17204 of the Business and Professions Code. Nothing in this section shall divest the division of its authority to enforce this code and all labor laws of the state for the purposes of Section 95. Nothing in this chapter shall
 be read to limit or restrict a public prosecutor’s existing authority pursuant to Section 17204 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) In addition to any other remedies available, a public prosecutor may seek injunctive relief to prevent continued violations of Division 2 (commencing with Section 200), but excluding Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 1140) and Part 13 (commencing with Section 2698), or Division 3 (commencing with Section 2700), but excluding Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070).

(c) The court shall award a prevailing plaintiff in that action its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees and
 costs.

(d) (1) A public prosecutor shall provide a 14-day notice to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement prior to prosecuting an action under this section. A public prosecutor’s failure to provide this notice shall not constitute a defense to the action.

(2) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall have the right to intervene in any court proceedings brought pursuant to this section by a public prosecutor unless the public prosecutor has statewide authority or has enforcement authority pursuant to Section 17204 of the Business and Professions Code, in which case intervention in a proceeding brought pursuant to this section shall be permissive.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.
 This subdivision shall not apply to any action initiated in court by a public prosecutor prior to January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 969, Sec. 1.   (AB 2738)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

182.

In any action initiated by a public prosecutor or the Labor Commissioner to enforce this code, any individual agreement between a worker and employer that purports to limit representative actions or to mandate private arbitration shall have no effect on the authority of the public
 prosecutor or the Labor Commissioner to enforce the code. Any subsequent appeal of the denial of any motion or other court filing to impose such restrictions on a public prosecutor or the Labor Commissioner
 shall not stay the trial court proceedings, notwithstanding Section 916 of the Code of Civil Procedure. An individual agreement does not include a collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 659, Sec. 2.   (AB 594)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. EMPLOYMENT REGULATION AND SUPERVISION [200. - 2699.8.]



PART 1. COMPENSATION [200. - 452.]



  CHAPTER 1. Payment of Wages [200. - 281.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Occupations [200. - 244.]

200.

As used in this article: (a) “Wages” includes all amounts for labor performed by employees of every description, whether the amount is fixed or ascertained by the standard of time, task, piece, commission basis, or other method of calculation.

(b) “Labor” includes labor, work, or service whether rendered or performed under contract, subcontract, partnership, station plan, or other agreement if the labor to be paid for is performed personally by the person demanding payment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

200.3.

(a) A successor to a judgment debtor shall be liable for any wages, damages, and penalties owed to any of the judgment debtor’s former workforce pursuant to a final
 judgment, after the time to appeal therefrom has expired and for which no appeal therefrom is pending. Successorship is established upon meeting any of the following criteria:

(1) Uses substantially
 the same facilities or substantially the same workforce to offer substantially the same services as the judgment debtor. This factor does not apply to employers who maintain the same workforce pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 1060) of Part 3.

(2) Has substantially the same owners or managers that control the labor relations as the
 judgment debtor.

(3) Employs as a managing agent any person who directly controlled the wages, hours, or working conditions of the affected workforce of the judgment debtor. The term managing agent has the same meaning as in subdivision (b) of Section 3294 of the Civil Code.

(4) Operates a business in the same industry and the business has an owner, partner, officer, or director who is an immediate family member of any owner, partner, officer, or director of the judgment debtor.

(b) This section shall not be construed to limit other means of establishing successor liability for wages, damages, and penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 357, Sec. 7.   (AB 3075)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

200.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this code or Section 340 of the Code of Civil Procedure, to collect a civil penalty, fee, or penalty fee under this division, the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall commence an action within three years from the date the penalty or fee became final. Upon commencement of an action, the clerk of the superior court shall enter judgment immediately in conformity therewith.

(b) This section applies only to penalty assessments or fees that became final on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(c) For purposes of this
 section, “commence an action” means to file a request for entry of judgment on a civil penalty or fee with the clerk of the superior court of the relevant county.

(d) For purposes of this section, “final” means the time to appeal has expired and there is no appeal pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 655, Sec. 3.   (AB 469)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

201.

(a) If an employer discharges an employee, the wages earned and unpaid at the time of discharge are due and payable immediately. An employer who lays off a group of employees by reason of the termination of seasonal employment in the curing, canning, or drying of any variety of perishable fruit, fish, or vegetables, shall be deemed to have made immediate payment when the wages of said employees are paid within a reasonable time as necessary for computation and payment thereof; provided, however, that the reasonable time shall not exceed 72 hours, and further provided that payment shall be made by mail to any employee who so requests and designates a mailing address therefor.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the state employer
 shall be deemed to have made an immediate payment of wages under this section for any unused or accumulated vacation, annual leave, holiday leave, or time off to which the employee is entitled by reason of previous overtime work where compensating time off was given by the appointing power, provided, at least five workdays prior to his or her final day of employment, the employee submits a written election to his or her appointing power authorizing the state employer to tender payment for any or all leave to be contributed on a pretax basis or a Roth basis, in the year of discharge, to the employee’s account in a state-sponsored supplemental retirement plan as described under Sections 401(k), 403(b), or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code provided the plan allows those contributions. The contribution shall be deposited into the employee’s 401(k), 403(b), or 457 plan account no later than two and one-half months after the employee’s discharge from employment. This section is not intended to authorize
 contributions in excess of the annual deferral limits imposed under federal and state law or the provisions of the supplemental retirement plan itself.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, when the state employer discharges an employee, the employee may, at least five workdays prior to his or her final day of employment, submit a written election to his or her appointing power authorizing the state employer to defer into the next calendar year payment of any or all of the employee’s unused or accumulated vacation, annual leave, holiday leave, or time off to which the employee is entitled by reason of previous overtime work where compensating time off was given by the appointing power. An employee electing to defer payment into the next calendar year under this section may do any of the following:

(1) Contribute the entire payment to his or her 401(k), 403(b), or 457 plan
 account.

(A) This election is only available if the employee is terminated from service on or after November 1 of the calendar year of his or her termination.

(B) The contributions shall be deposited into an applicable plan account no later than two and one-half months after the employee’s last day of employment.

(2) Contribute any portion of the deferred payment to his or her 401(k), 403(b), or 457 plan account and receive cash payment for the remaining noncontributed unused leave.

(A) An employee is eligible to defer a portion of the deferred payment into a 401(k), 403(b), or 457 plan account only if the employee’s date of termination from service was on or after November 1 of the calendar year of his or her termination.

(B) For the portion deferred into a 401(k), 403(b), or 457 plan account, the contributions shall be deposited into an applicable plan account no later than two and one-half months after the employee’s last day of employment.

(C) For the portion received as a cash payment:

(i) Only that portion of leave that extends past the November pay period for the employee shall be deferred into the next calendar year.

(ii) Payments shall be tendered under this paragraph no later than February 1 in the year following the employee’s last day of employment.

(3) Receive a lump-sum payment for all of the deferred unused leave as described above.

(A) Only that portion of leave that extends past the November pay period for the employee shall be deferred into the next calendar year.

(B) Payments shall be tendered under this paragraph no later than February 1 in the year following the employee’s last day of employment.

(d) This section is not intended to authorize contributions in excess of the annual deferral limits imposed under federal and state law or the provisions of the supplemental retirement plan itself.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 903, Sec. 19.   (SB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

201.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Temporary services employer” means an employing unit that contracts with clients or customers to supply workers to perform services for the clients or customers and that performs all of the following functions:

(A) Negotiates with clients and customers for matters such as the time and place where the services are to be provided, the type of work, the working conditions, and the quality and price of the services.

(B) Determines assignments or reassignments of workers, even if workers retain the right to refuse specific assignments.

(C) Retains the authority to assign or reassign a worker to another client or customer when the worker is determined unacceptable by a specific client or customer.

(D) Assigns or reassigns workers to perform services for clients or customers.

(E) Sets the rate of pay of workers, whether or not through negotiation.

(F) Pays workers from its own account or accounts.

(G) Retains the right to hire and terminate workers.

(2) “Temporary services employer” does not include any of the following:

(A) A bona fide nonprofit organization that provides temporary service
 employees to clients.

(B) A farm labor contractor, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1682.
